Hawaii statutes.
§291C-130 Slow moving vehicle emblem
required; penalty. (a) Any vehicle,
or combination of vehicles, designed to operate at a speed of twenty-five miles
per hour or less, including a neighborhood electric vehicle, and traveling on a
public highway, except when guarded by a flagperson or a flare, or unless
provided by ordinance, shall display a triangular slow moving vehicle emblem
meeting ASAE Standard S276.2 as developed by the American Society of
Agricultural Engineers, mounted on the rear of the vehicle, or combination of
vehicles, base down and at a height of not less than three nor more than five
feet from the ground to base.

(b) The use of the emblem on any vehicle,
other than a vehicle designed to operate at a speed of twenty-five miles per
hour or less, or on a stationary object on a public highway is prohibited.

(c) Any person who violates this section shall
be fined not more than $500. [L 1975, c 22, §1; am L 1993, c 214, §13; gen ch
1993; am L 1999, c 262, §3(4)]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next